Hawaii statutes.
[§328-120] Recordkeeping. (a)
Wholesale distributors shall establish and maintain inventories and records of
all transactions regarding the receipt and distribution or other disposition of
prescription drugs. These records shall include the following information:

(1) The source of the drugs, including the name and
principal address of the seller or transferor, and the address of the location
from which the drugs were shipped;

(2) The identity and quantity of the drugs received
and distributed or disposed of; and

(3) The dates of receipt and distribution or other
disposition of the drugs.

(b) Inventories and records shall be made
available for inspection and photocopying by the department or any authorized
federal, state, or local law enforcement officials for a period of five years
following disposition of the drugs.

(c) Records described in this section that are
kept at the inspection site or that can be retrieved immediately by computer or
other electronic means shall be readily available for authorized inspection
during the retention period. Records kept at a central location apart from the
inspection site and not electronically retrievable shall be made available for
inspection within two working days of a request by the department or any authorized
official of a federal, state, or local law enforcement agency. [L 1992, c 196,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next